Illinois, session 104th, HB5578.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 5amended by adding Section 65.135 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 947/65.135 new)7    Sec. 65.135. Manufacturing Promise Scholarship Program. 8    (a) The Commission shall establish a Manufacturing Promise 9Scholarship Program to award scholarships to State residents 10who are enrolled in a public community college or other 11program with a major in manufacturing or a skilled trade.12    (b) Subject to a separate appropriation for such purposes, 13the Commission shall, each year, receive and consider 14applications for a scholarship under this Section. An 15applicant is eligible for a scholarship under this Section if 16the Commission finds that the applicant meets all of the 17following criteria:18        (1) Is a resident of this State and a citizen or 19    permanent resident of the United States.20        (2) Is enrolled in either (i) a public community 21    college in this State for the purpose of obtaining a 22    degree, certificate, or other credential offered by the 23    community college in manufacturing or a skilled trade, as   HB5578- 2 -LRB104 19868 LNS 33318 b1    applicable, or (ii) an apprenticeship or union program in 2    this State and maintains satisfactory academic progress.3    (c) The Commission shall reserve 20% of the amount 4appropriated for scholarships under this Section in a given 5fiscal year for students who are from underrepresented areas. 6The Commission shall make scholarships under this Section 7available to traditional college-aged students, adults, and 8non-traditional students.9    (d) An applicant who receives a scholarship under this 10Section may not be required to return scholarship funds.11    (e) The Commission shall adopt rules for the 12implementation and administration of this Section.